Washington statutes.
RCW 36.54.070

Joint ferries over water boundary between two counties—County commissioner duties enumerated—Omission as ground for impeachment.

The members of the board of county commissioners of each county shall be members of the joint commission and their refusal to act shall be ground for impeachment. They shall provide for the maintenance and operation of the ferry until it is discontinued by a majority vote of the joint commission.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.54.070. Prior: 1917 c 158 s 5; RRS s 5483.]